Washington statutes.
RCW 9.08.072

Transferring stolen pet animal to a research institution—Penalty.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to receive with intent to sell to a research institution in the state of Washington, or sell or otherwise directly transfer to a research institution in the state of Washington, a pet animal that the person knows or has reason to know has been stolen or fraudulently obtained. This section does not apply to U.S.D.A. licensed dealers.

(2) The first conviction under this section is a gross misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW and, for adult offenders, a mandatory fine of not less than five hundred dollars per pet animal shall be imposed.

(3) A second or subsequent conviction under this section is a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW and, for adult offenders, a mandatory fine of not less than one thousand dollars per pet animal shall be imposed.

(4) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a person from also being convicted of separate offenses under RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, or 9A.56.050 for theft or under RCW 9A.56.150, 9A.56.160, or 9A.56.170 for possession of stolen property.

[ 2015 c 265 s 11; 2003 c 53 s 10.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 c 265: See note following RCW 13.50.010.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.